tr: Dolgu seviyesi: Jel dolgulu; Kalın dolgulu; Hafif dolgulu; Hafızalı sünger dolgulu; Orta dolgulu; Yok; Diğer
vi: Mức đệm: Đệm gel; Đệm dày; Đệm mỏng; Đệm mút hoạt tính; Đệm vừa; Không đệm; Khác
pt-PT: nível: Com acolchoamento em gel; Muito acolchoado; Ligeiramente acolchoado; Acolchoamento com espuma de memória; Moderadamente acolchoado; Nenhum; Outro
ja: 余白レベル: ジェルパッド入り; 厚手のパッド入り; 薄手のパッド入り; メモリーフォームパッド入り; 中程度のパッド入り; なし; その他
bg-BG: Ниво на подложката: С гел подплата; Силно подплатен; Леко подплатен; С мемори пяна; Умерено подплатен; Без подплата; Друго
sl-SI: Raven blazinjenja: Oblazinjeno z gelom; Močno oblazinjeno; Rahlo oblazinjeno; Oblazinjeno s spominsko peno; Srednje oblazinjeno; Brez; Drugo
pt-BR: Nível de acolchoamento: Acolchoado com gel; Muito acolchoado; Levemente acolchoado; Acolchoado com espuma de memória; Moderadamente acolchoado; Nenhum; Outro
es: Nivel de relleno: Con relleno de gel; Con mucho relleno; Con poco relleno; Con relleno de espuma viscoelástica; Con relleno moderado; Ninguno; Otro
fr: Niveau de rembourrage: Rembourrage en gel; Fortement rembourré; Légèrement rembourré; Rembourrage en mousse à mémoire de forme; Modérément rembourré; Aucun; Autre
sv: Vadderingsnivå: Gelvadderad; Kraftigt vadderad; Lätt vadderad; Vadderad med minnesskum; Måttligt vadderad; Ingen; Övrigt
fi: Pehmustustaso: Geelipehmustettu; Paksusti pehmustettu; Kevyesti pehmustettu; Muistivaahtopehmustettu; Keskipaksusti pehmustettu; Ei mitään; Muu
hu: Párnázottsági szint: Gélpárnázott; Erősen párnázott; Enyhén párnázott; Memóriahabos párnázott; Közepesen párnázott; Nincs; Egyéb
zh-CN: 衬垫等级: 凝胶填充; 加厚填充; 轻度填充; 记忆海绵填充; 中度填充; 无; 其他
ro-RO: Nivelul de căptușeală: Căptușit cu gel; Puternic căptușit; Ușor căptușit; Căptușit cu spumă cu memorie; Moderat căptușit; Fără; Altele
el: Επίπεδο επένδυσης: Με επένδυση τζελ; Με παχιά επένδυση; Με λεπτή επένδυση; Με επένδυση αφρού μνήμης; Με μέτρια επένδυση; Καμία; Άλλο
th: การเว้นขอบในระดับ: บุเจล; บุหนามาก; บุบาง; บุเมมโมรีโฟม; บุหนาปานกลาง; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 襯墊厚度等級: 凝膠襯墊; 加厚襯墊; 輕薄襯墊; 記憶泡棉襯墊; 中等襯墊; 無; 其他
cs: Úroveň výplně: Gelové polstrování; Silné polstrování; Lehké polstrování; Polstrování z paměťové pěny; Střední polstrování; Žádné; Jiné
ru: Уровень набивки: С гелевой набивкой; Плотная набивка; Легкая набивка; С набивкой из пены с эффектом памяти; Умеренная набивка; Без набивки; Другое
sk-SK: Úroveň výplne: S gélovou výplňou; S hrubou výplňou; S ľahkou výplňou; S výplňou z pamäťovej peny; So strednou výplňou; Žiadna; Iné
it: Livello di imbottitura: Imbottitura in gel; Molto imbottito; Leggermente imbottito; Imbottitura in memory foam; Moderatamente imbottito; Nessuno; Altro
en: Padding level: Gel padded; Heavily padded; Lightly padded; Memory foam padded; Moderately padded; None; Other
pl: Poziom wyściółki: Z wyściółką żelową; Mocno wyściełane; Lekko wyściełane; Wyściełane pianką z pamięcią kształtu; Średnio wyściełane; Brak; Inne
da: Pudeniveau: Med gelpolstring; Tyk polstring; Tynd polstring; Med memoryskumpolstring; Moderat polstring; Ingen; Andet
hr-HR: Nivo razmaka: Podstavljeno gelom; Jako podstavljeno; Lagano podstavljeno; Podstavljeno memorijskom pjenom; Umjereno podstavljeno; Nema; Ostalo
lt-LT: Paminkštinimo lygis: Paminkštintas geliu; Stipriai paminkštintas; Lengvai paminkštintas; Paminkštintas „Memory“ putomis; Vidutiniškai paminkštintas; Nėra; Kita
de: Polsterungsgrad: Mit Gel gepolstert; Stark gepolstert; Leicht gepolstert; Mit Memory-Schaum gepolstert; Mäßig gepolstert; Keine; Sonstige
nb: Polstringsnivå: Polstret med gelé; Kraftig polstret; Lett polstret; Polstret med minneskum; Moderat polstret; Ingen; Annet
ko: 패딩 수준: 겔 패딩; 두꺼운 패딩; 얇은 패딩; 메모리 폼 패딩; 보통 두께 패딩; 없음; 기타
nl: Vulmatriaal niveau: Gewatteerd met gel; Dik gewatteerd; Licht gewatteerd; Gewatteerd met traagschuim; Matig gewatteerd; Geen; Overig